test/src/gt-desc-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Tests:
  Noun - alkoholaváddu: # GOAHTI-A SgNom + GOAHTI-U 
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Nom: alkoholaváddu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Nom: álkoholaváddu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Nom: álkoholaváddu
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Gen: alkoholaváttu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Gen: álkoholaváttu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Gen: álkoholaváttu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro: álkoholavátto
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro: álkoholavátto
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Acc: alkoholaváttu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Acc: álkoholaváttu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Acc: álkoholaváttu
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Loc: alkoholaváttus
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Loc: álkoholaváttus
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Loc: álkoholaváttus
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Ill: alkoholaváddui
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Ill: álkoholaváddui
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Ill: álkoholaváddui
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Com: alkoholaváttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: álkoholaváttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Com: álkoholaváttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: álkoholaváttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Com: álkoholaváttuin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom: alkoholaváttut
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom: álkoholaváttut
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom: álkoholaváttut
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: alkoholaváttuk
    alkohola+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: alkoholaváttuk
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: álkoholaváttuk
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: álkoholaváttuk
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Gen: alkoholaváttuid 
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Gen: álkoholaváttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Gen: álkoholaváttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Gen: álkoholaváttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Gen: álkoholaváttuid
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Acc: alkoholaváttuid 
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: álkoholaváttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Acc: álkoholaváttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: álkoholaváttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Acc: álkoholaváttuid
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Loc: alkoholaváttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: álkoholaváttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Loc: álkoholaváttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: álkoholaváttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Loc: álkoholaváttuin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Ill: alkoholaváttuide
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ill: álkoholaváttuide
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Ill: álkoholaváttuide
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ill: álkoholaváttuide
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Ill: álkoholaváttuide
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Com: alkoholaváttuiguin 
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: álkoholaváttuiguin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Com: álkoholaváttuiguin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: álkoholaváttuiguin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Com: álkoholaváttuiguin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Ess: alkoholaváddun
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Ess: álkoholaváddun
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Ess: álkoholaváddun
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:             alkoholaváttoš
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: álkoholaváttoš  
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: álkoholaváttoš
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: alkoholaváttožaš
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: álkoholaváttožaš
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: álkoholaváttožaš
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [alkoholaváttuheapme, alkoholaváttoheapme]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: alkoholaváttuhin
    alkohola+N+Err/Orth-a/á+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: alkoholaváttuhin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: álkoholaváttohin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: álkoholaváttohin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: alkoholaváttoheapmi
    alkohola+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: alkoholaváttoheapmi
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: álkoholaváttoheapme
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: álkoholaváttoheapme
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: alkoholaváttuheapmi
    alkohola+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: alkoholaváttuheapmi
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: alkoholaváttohin
    alkohola+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: alkoholaváttohin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: álkoholaváttoheapmi
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: álkoholaváttoheapmi
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: álkoholaváttuheapme
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: álkoholaváttuheapme
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: álkoholaváttuhin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: álkoholaváttuhin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: álkoholaváttuheapmi
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: álkoholaváttuheapmi
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: alkoholaváttolaš
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: álkoholaváttolaš
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: álkoholaváttolaš
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Nom: alkohola-váddu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Nom: álkohola-váddu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Nom: álkohola-váddu
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Gen: alkohola-váttu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Gen: álkohola-váttu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Gen: álkohola-váttu
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Acc: alkohola-váttu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Acc: álkohola-váttu
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Acc: álkohola-váttu
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Loc: alkohola-váttus   
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Loc: álkohola-váttus
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Loc: álkohola-váttus
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Ill: alkohola-váddui     
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Ill: álkohola-váddui
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Com:  alkohola-váttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: álkohola-váttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Com: álkohola-váttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: álkohola-váttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Com: álkohola-váttuin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom:  alkohola-váttut
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: álkohola-váttuk
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: álkohola-váttuk 
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: alkohola-váttuk
    alkohola+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: alkohola-váttuk
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom: álkohola-váttut
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom: álkohola-váttut
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Gen:  alkohola-váttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Gen: álkohola-váttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Gen: álkohola-váttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Gen: álkohola-váttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Gen: álkohola-váttuid
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Acc:  alkohola-váttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: álkohola-váttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Acc: álkohola-váttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: álkohola-váttuid
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Acc: álkohola-váttuid
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Loc:  alkohola-váttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: álkohola-váttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Loc: álkohola-váttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: álkohola-váttuin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Loc: álkohola-váttuin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Ill: alkohola-váttuide
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ill: álkohola-váttuide
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Ill: álkohola-váttuide
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ill: álkohola-váttuide
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Ill: álkohola-váttuide
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Com: alkohola-váttuiguin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: álkohola-váttuiguin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Com: álkohola-váttuiguin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Com:  álkohola-váttuiguin
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Com: álkohola-váttuiguin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Ess: alkohola-váddun
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Ess: álkohola-váddun
    alkohola+Err/Orth-a/á+N+Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Ess: álkohola-váddun
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: alkohola-váttoš
